Mississippi, session 2026, SB2522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "UPSKILL Mississippi Grant Program," an initiative designed to support Upgrading Priority Skills for Key Industry Learning & Labor through tuition-free access to workforce-aligned community and junior college programs. SECTION 2. (1)  The Legislature finds that establishing attainable workforce goals reflects Mississippi's commitment to creating a source of skilled workers to address workforce shortages and build a sustainable economic future, which begins with investing in education programs that meet the needs of both employers and communities.  Mississippi's workforce development goals center around equipping its citizens with the skills necessary to meet the demands of high-growth, high-demand industries.  Such goals include the following: (a)  Expand career and technical education (CTE) opportunities; (b)  Align education and training with emphasis on Mississippi's high-value pathways and/or priority occupations, as identified by Accelerate MS, targeting industries with workforce shortages; (c)  Address workforce shortages in rural areas; (d)  Promote lifelong learning and upskilling; (e)  Support economic resilience through public-private partnerships; (f)  Increase access to funding and support services; and (g)  Focus on data-driven workforce solutions. (2)  Therefore, the intent of the Legislature is to: (a)  Provide funding to the Mississippi Office of Student Financial Aid to establish a grant program for the purposes outlined herein; (b)  Provide tuition-free access to community colleges for enrollment in programs that are aligned with Mississippi's high-value pathways and/or priority occupations, as identified by Accelerate MS, which result in a certificate or degree, ensuring a source of skilled workers to meet the state's economic demands; and (c)  To gauge the effectiveness of this program by gathering data related to participation and employment outcomes. SECTION 3. (1)  There is established the UPSKILL Mississippi Grant Program, which shall be administered by the Mississippi Office of Student Financial Aid, for the purpose of providing grants to eligible recipients to cover tuition and fees associated with attending a Mississippi public community or junior college for the length of time required to earn a certificate or associate degree in an eligible program.  This program shall be subject to the availability of funds appropriated by the Legislature. (2)  As used in this act, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Accelerate Mississippi" means the Office of Workforce Development. (b)  "Office" means the Mississippi Office of Student Financial Aid. (c)  "Eligible institution" means any Mississippi public community college. (d)  "Eligible recipient" means a person who: (i)  Has been a resident of Mississippi for at least two (2) years prior to application for participation in the Mississippi Workforce Promise Grant Program and continues to physically reside in the state; (ii)  Is a United States citizen or a lawful, permanent resident; (iii)  Has a high school diploma, GED or equivalent; (iv)  Is enrolled at least half-time in an eligible program at a Mississippi community college; (v)  Has completed a Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) and qualifies as an independent student on the basis of age and is at least twenty-four (24) years of age; (vi)  Has completed the Mississippi Aid Application and submitted all required supporting documents by the deadline established in rules promulgated by the Mississippi Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board; and (vii)  Maintains satisfactory academic progress as defined by the administering institution. (3)  The Mississippi Office of Student Financial Aid shall: (a)  Serve as the fiscal agent in administering the program; (b)  With the Mississippi Postsecondary Education Financial Assistance Board, promulgate rules and regulations for administering the program; (c)  Establish an annual application and application process; (d)  Receive and review applications; (e)  Inform each eligible recipient of the amount of his or her award, which shall equal the student's outstanding tuition and fees after other gift aid, plus a book/material stipend of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per year; (f)  Disburse funds to eligible institutions on behalf of eligible recipients upon verification of enrollment in an eligible program; (g)  Use no more than five percent (5%) of the funds allocated for this section for the administration of the program; and (h)  Include the program in its annual report to the Legislature.  The report shall contain a detailed explanation of how the funds appropriated for the program were awarded, how many students have participated in the program, and their education and employment outcomes where available. (4)  Eligible institutions shall: (a)  Provide the following support services to grant recipients: (i)  Assign an advisor or success coach to contact each grant recipient a minimum of three (3) times per term to assist with enrollment, financial aid, career planning, or other topics as needed to support program continuation and completion; (ii)  Enroll each recipient in Mississippi Works; (iii)  Provide career integration by creating program maps aligning eligible programs with careers and connect grant recipients to paid practicums or apprenticeships where possible; (iv)  Identify alternative funding sources, such as Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (WIOA) or Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) funds, to provide up to Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) per term per grant recipient in emergency aid, childcare stipends or transportation assistance (bus vouchers or gas cards); (v)  When possible, offer flexible program delivery, such as evening, weekend, and online program participation; (vi)  Utilize data and early alert systems to support recipients. (b)  Report to the office each term: (i)  Student COA; (ii)  Federal grants received; (iii) Institutional grants received; (iv)  Other grants received; (v)  Loans received; (vi)  Work Study received; (vii) Degree/credential earned; and (viii)  Program CIP code. (5)  Accelerate MS shall annually provide a list of eligible programs based on priority sectors and occupations to the office, which shall use the list to determine the eligibility of applicants. SECTION 4. (1)  The timeline for program implementation will be as follows: (a)  Year One - At the commencement of the Spring Semester of 2027, administer a limited pilot program. (b)  Year Two - Beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, administer a full pilot program. (c)  Year Three - Beginning with the 2028-2029 academic year, fully implement the program. (2)  The Mississippi Office of Student Financial Aid shall be authorized to develop each phase of the program. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.